Connecticut, session 2026, HB05425.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) The Office of Fiscal Analysis shall
2 conduct a review of appropriations authorized from appropriated funds
3 other than the General Fund in the state budget for the biennium ending
4 June 30, 2027, and shall identify general areas of spending for which
5 appropriations increased by ten per cent or more over appropriations
6 authorized from such funds in the state budget for the immediately
7 preceding biennium. On or before February 1, 2027, said office shall
8 submit, in accordance with section 11-4a of the general statutes, the
9 results of its review to the joint standing committee of the General
10 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and
11 the budgets of state agencies.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
APP Joint Favorable
HB5425 / File No. 640 1

HB5425 File No. 640
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Office of Fiscal Analysis (OFA) to conduct a
review of appropriations for FY 27, excluding the General Fund, and
identify major cost increases from the previous fiscal year. This
requirement does not result in a fiscal impact because the office
currently has the expertise and existing staff to conduct the review and
report the results to the Appropriations Committee by February 1, 2027.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5425 / File No. 640 2

HB5425 File No. 640
OFA Bill Analysis
HB 5425
AN ACT CONCERNING EXPENDITURES OF APPROPRIATED
FUNDS OTHER THAN THE GENERAL FUND.
SUMMARY:
The bill requires the Office of Fiscal Analysis (OFA) to conduct a
review of other appropriated funds authorized in the state budget for
the biennium ending June 30, 2027. The review shall identify general
areas of spending for which appropriations increased by ten percent or
more from the preceding fiscal year. OFA must submit its result of the
review to the Appropriations Committee by February 1, 2027.
EFFECTIVE DATE: July 1, 2026
BACKGROUND
Proposed Budget
The proposed budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027
appropriates resources for the General Fund and the following eleven
other appropriated funds: the Special Transportation Fund, the
Municipal Revenue Sharing Fund, the Banking Fund, the Insurance
Fund, the Consumer Counsel and Public Utility Control Fund, the
Workers' Compensation Fund, the Mashantucket Pequot and Mohegan
Fund, the Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund, the Cannabis
Regulatory Fund, the Cannabis Prevention and Recovery Service Fund,
and the Tourism Fund.
COMMITTEE ACTION
Appropriations Committee
Joint Favorable
Yea 39 Nay 13 (4/1/2026)
HB5425 / File No. 640 3